Illinois, session 104th, SB128.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Animal Control Act is amended by changing 5Section 8 as follows: 6    (510 ILCS 5/8)  (from Ch. 8, par. 358)7    Sec. 8. Rabies inoculation. 8    (a) Every owner of a dog 4 months or more of age shall have 9each dog inoculated against rabies by a licensed veterinarian. 10Every dog shall have a second rabies vaccination within one 11year of the first. Terms of subsequent vaccine administration 12and duration of immunity must be in compliance with USDA 13licenses of vaccines used. 14    (b) Every owner of a cat that is a companion animal and is 154 months or more of age shall have each cat inoculated against 16rabies by a licensed veterinarian. Every cat that is a 17companion animal shall have a second rabies vaccination within 18one year of the first. Terms of subsequent vaccine 19administration and duration of immunity must be in compliance 20with USDA licenses of vaccines used. This subsection (b) does 21not apply to feral cats; however, if a feral cat is presented 22to a licensed veterinarian for sterilization, the feral cat 23shall be inoculated against rabies, unless the person   SB0128 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07382 BDA 17422 b1presenting the feral cat for care provides an inoculation 2certificate showing that the feral cat has been inoculated 3against rabies, and the cost of the inoculation shall be paid 4by the person presenting the feral cat to a licensed 5veterinarian for care. 6    (c) A veterinarian immunizing a dog, cat, or ferret 7against rabies shall provide the Administrator of the county 8in which the dog, cat, or ferret resides with a certificate of 9immunization. Evidence of such rabies inoculation shall be 10entered on a certificate the form of which shall be approved by 11the Board and which shall contain the microchip number of the 12dog, cat, or ferret if it has one and which shall be signed by 13the licensed veterinarian administering the vaccine. Only one 14dog, cat, or ferret shall be included on each certificate. 15    (d) Veterinarians who inoculate a dog shall procure from 16the County Animal Control in the county where their office is 17located serially numbered tags, one to be issued with each 18inoculation certificate. The Board shall cause a rabies 19inoculation tag to be issued, at a fee established by the Board 20for each dog inoculated against rabies.21    (e) A veterinarian who inoculates a cat that is a 22companion animal shall issue an inoculation certificate to the 23owner which shall comply with any registration requirements 24adopted by the county under Section 3 of this Act. The owner 25shall pay any fee imposed by the county under Section 3 of this 26Act. A veterinarian who inoculates a feral cat shall issue an   SB0128 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07382 BDA 17422 b1inoculation certificate to the person who presented the feral 2cat for veterinary care. The registration requirements or any 3fee imposed by the county under Section 3 of this Act shall not 4apply to feral cats. 5    (f) Rabies vaccine for use on animals shall be sold or 6distributed only to and used only by licensed veterinarians. 7Such rabies vaccine shall be licensed by the United States 8Department of Agriculture.9    (g) If a licensed veterinarian determines in writing that 10a rabies inoculation would compromise an animal's health, then 11the animal shall be exempt from the rabies inoculation 12requirement for the period described in this subsection; , 13however, the owner is still responsible for the tag fees. A 14determination under this subsection is valid for one year but 15may be annually renewed thereafter by a licensed veterinarian. 16    (h) If a bite occurs from an exempt animal, the exempt 17animal shall be treated as an unvaccinated animal. If the 18animal is exempt, the animal shall be re-examined by a 19licensed veterinarian on no less than an annual basis and be 20vaccinated against rabies as soon as the animal's health 21permits.22(Source: P.A. 101-299, eff. 1-1-20.)